Massachusetts, session 194th, H1988.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. There shall be a commission to study and make recommendations to the
joint committee on the judiciary, the Chief Justice of the Trial Court, and the Court
Administrator for the Trial Court regarding the accessibility and privacy of sensitive information
in court documents.
SECTION 2. The commission shall consist of 2 members appointed by the senate
president, 1 of whom shall be the senate chair of the joint committee on the judiciary, and 1 of
whom shall serve as co-chair of the commission; 2 members appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives, 1 of whom shall be the house chair of the joint committee on the
judiciary, and 1 of whom shall serve as co-chair of the commission; 1 member appointed by the
minority leader of the senate; 1 member appointed by the minority leader of the house of
representatives; the secretary of public safety and security or a designee; the chief justice of the
of 2

trial court or a designee; the court administrator for the trial court or a designee; 2 members
appointed by the governor, 1 of whom shall be an expert on inter-partner violence, abuse and
harassment, and 1 of whom shall be an expert on transparency and public records laws; and 1
person appointed from each of the following organizations: the Massachusetts Chapter of the
Association of Family and Conciliation Courts; the Mass Family Advocacy Coalition, the
Massachusetts Bar Association; Jane Doe, Inc.
SECTION 3. The commission shall consider and make recommendations concerning
whether and how certain sensitive information, including but not limited to residential and
mailing addresses, financial and banking information, social security numbers, medical
information, names and dates of birth of children, child custody agreement terms, child support
agreement amounts, should be publicly accessible in legal documents in the court system. These
recommendations shall include:
(i) whether any such information should or should not be accessible online;
(ii) whether any such information should or should not be accessible only by request in
person at a courthouse, and what the conditions for such a successful request should be.
SECTION 4. The commission shall report its findings and recommendations to the joint
committee on the judiciary, the Chief Justice of the Trial Court, and to the Court Administrator
for the Trial Court on or before January 1, 2026.
of 2